California statutes. Insurance Code
 determines after a public hearing, that an insurer on the list established pursuant to subdivision (f), (A) is in an unsound financial condition, (B) does not meet the approval requirements under subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, (C) has violated the laws of this state, or (D) without justification, or with a frequency so as to indicate a general business practice, delays the payment of just claims, the commissioner may issue an order removing the insurer from the list. Notice of hearing shall be served upon the insurer or its agent for service of process stating the time and place of the hearing and the conduct, condition, or ground upon which the commissioner would make his or her order. The hearing shall occur not less than 20 days, nor more than 30 days, after notice is served upon the insurer or its agent for service of process.

(2) If the commissioner determines that an insurer’s immediate removal from the list is necessary to protect
 the public or a home state insured or home state insured applicant of the insurer, or, in the case of an application by an insurer to be placed on the list that is being denied by the commissioner, the commissioner may issue an order pursuant to paragraph (1) without prior notice and hearing. At the time an order is served pursuant to this paragraph to an insurer on the list, the commissioner shall also issue and serve upon the insurer a statement of the reasons that immediate removal is necessary. An order issued pursuant to this paragraph shall include a notice stating the time and place of a hearing on the order, which shall be not less than 20 days, nor more than 30 days, after the notice is served.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), in a case where the commissioner is basing a decision to remove an insurer from the list, or deny an application to be placed on the list, on the failure of the insurer or applicant to comply with,
 meet, or maintain any of the objective criteria established by this section, or by regulation adopted pursuant to this section, the commissioner may specify this fact in the order, and a hearing shall not be required to be held on the order.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), the commissioner may, without prior notice or hearing, remove from the list established pursuant to subdivision (f) an insurer that has failed or refused to timely provide documents required by this section, or regulations adopted to implement this section. In the case of removal pursuant to this paragraph, the commissioner shall notify all surplus line brokers of the action.

(h) In addition to other statements or reports required by this chapter, the commissioner may also address to a licensee a written request for full and complete information respecting the financial stability, reputation, and
 integrity of a nonadmitted insurer with whom the licensee has dealt or proposes to deal in the transaction of insurance business with a home state insured. The licensee so addressed shall promptly furnish in written or printed form so much of the information requested as he or she can produce, together with a signed statement identifying the same and giving reasons for omissions, if any. After due examination of the information and accompanying statement, the commissioner may, if he or she believes it to be in the public interest, advise the licensee in writing that the insurer does not qualify as an approved insurer. Any placement in the nonadmitted insurer made by a licensee after receipt of that advisement shall be accompanied by a copy of the advisement. The commissioner may issue an advisement when documents submitted pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d) do not meet the criteria of subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, or when the commissioner obtains documents on an insurer and the insurer does not meet
 the criteria of subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, and shall be authorized to not include or remove that insurer from the List of Approved Surplus Line Insurers.

(i) The commissioner shall require, at least annually, the submission of records and statements reasonably necessary to ensure that the requirements of this section are maintained.

(j) The schedule of fees to cover the costs of administering and enforcing this chapter are as follows:

(1) Initial application, six thousand one hundred thirteen dollars ($6,113).

(2) Renewal application, three thousand fifty-seven dollars ($3,057).

(3) Financial update, three hundred forty-one dollars ($341).

(4) Nonfinancial update, fifty dollars ($50).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 47.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1765.3.

(a) A license under this chapter may be issued to an individual or any legal business entity. If issued to a business entity or individual that maintains more than one surplus line office from which it transacts that business with California residents, it shall name the natural person or persons located at each such surplus line office maintained by the licensee who is or are responsible for the proper discharge at each office of all duties placed upon the licensee acting as a surplus line broker and each of these natural persons are required to be licensed as a surplus line broker. Each natural person shall meet all of the requirements for the license.

(b) Every application for a
 license filed by a corporation shall contain the names and addresses of all stockholders owning 10 percent or more of the corporation’s stock, and of all officers and directors of the corporation. Every licensed corporation shall file a written notice with the commissioner of all changes, except address changes, of its stockholders who own 10 percent or more of the corporation’s stock and of all officers and directors of the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 83, Sec. 22.   (AB 315)   Effective July 15, 2011.   Operative July 21, 2011, by Sec. 34 of Stats. 2011, Ch. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

1765.4.

Any natural person applying for a license to act as a surplus line broker shall prove his or her competency by showing he or she holds an existing license to act as a property broker-agent and casualty broker-agent, which requires passing the qualifying examination for that insurance broker’s license. Any natural person who is not a resident of California may prove his or her competency by showing that he or she holds an existing license for property and casualty in his or her resident state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 786, Sec. 36.   (AB 2303)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1765.5.

If an applicant for any license under this chapter, within one year from the date of the receipt by the commissioner of the application, whether or not the filing is complete, neither fully qualifies for and receives that license on a permanent basis, nor is denied its issue, such application is automatically denied without prejudice to the filing of a new application for the license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 83, Sec. 24.   (AB 315)   Effective July 15, 2011.   Operative July 21, 2011, by Sec. 34 of Stats. 2011, Ch. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

1766.

A payment of premium to a surplus line broker acting for a person other than himself or herself in negotiating, continuing, or renewing any policy of insurance under this chapter shall be deemed to be payment to the insurer, notwithstanding any conditions or stipulations in the policy or contract. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to relieve a surplus line broker or special lines’ surplus line broker of any obligation owed to a home state insured or home state insured applicant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 83, Sec. 25.   (AB 315)   Effective July 15, 2011.   Operative July 21, 2011, by Sec. 34 of Stats. 2011, Ch. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

1767.

A resident surplus line broker at all times shall maintain in good faith an office in this state and if he or she maintains more than one surplus line office in this state, he or she shall designate one of them as his or her principal surplus line office in this state and shall notify the commissioner of that designation. He or she shall report to the commissioner the addresses of all surplus line offices maintained by him or her in this state and any change in location of any of those offices. A nonresident surplus line broker at all times shall maintain in good faith an office in the state or territory of the United States in which he or she is licensed as a resident surplus line broker, and if he or she maintains more than one surplus line office in that state, he or she shall designate one of them as his or her principal surplus line office in that state and shall notify the commissioner of the designation. A resident licensee shall report to the commissioner the addresses of all surplus line offices maintained in this state and any change in location of any of those offices. Nonresident licensees shall report to the commissioner the addresses of all surplus line offices maintained in the state or territory of the United States in which the resident surplus line license is maintained and any change in location of any of those offices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 203, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1768.

A resident surplus line broker shall keep in this state complete records of the business transacted by him or her for California home state insureds with nonadmitted insurers under his or her license as a surplus line broker including all of the following documentation for each policy:

(a) Verification that the insured is a California home state insured.

(b) Verification that the commercial insured or industrial insured qualifies for the provisions of this code.

(c) Whether or not it is a single state policy or multistate policy.

(d) Where allocation of premium to the states is required, data
 necessary to make that allocation. A nonresident surplus line broker shall keep in the state where he or she is licensed as a resident surplus line broker complete records of the business transacted by him or her for California home state insureds with nonadmitted insurers under his or her California nonresident surplus line broker license, including subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive. The commissioner may waive or modify any of the foregoing requirements by issuance of a notice published on the department’s Internet Web site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 108.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1769.

Whenever required so to do by the commissioner, such surplus line broker shall furnish to the commissioner a list of the admitted insurers from which the entire amount of insurance desired was not obtainable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 980, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1770.

The commissioner, whenever he deems necessary, may examine the books and accounts of any surplus line broker for the purpose of determining whether or not the broker is conducting his business in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. For the purpose of making such examination such broker shall allow the commissioner free access at all times to all the broker’s books and papers, and the commissioner shall thoroughly inspect and examine all of the broker’s affairs.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1771.

The costs and expenses of all examinations by the commissioner shall be paid as prescribed in Section 736.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1008.)
-------------------------------------------

1772.

(a) A surplus line insurer may be sued upon any cause of action arising in this state under any surplus line insurance contract made by it, or any evidence of insurance issued or delivered by the surplus line broker, pursuant to the procedure set forth in Sections 1610 to 1620, inclusive. Any policy or evidence of insurance issued by the surplus line insurer or the surplus line broker shall contain a provision stating the substance of this section, and designating the person to whom the commissioner shall mail process.

(b) Every surplus line insurer assuming a surplus line insurance shall be deemed thereby to have subjected itself to this chapter.

(c) The remedies provided by this section shall be in addition to any other methods provided by law for service of process.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 980, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1773.

Surplus line brokers may advertise and solicit using print, electronic media, direct mail, and all other advertising or marketing media. These advertisements and solicitations may include a description of nonadmitted insurance products available through the surplus line broker, and may include the name of any nonadmitted insurer, provided that all of the following apply: (a) the insurer is authorized to accept placements from the surplus line broker pursuant to Section 1765.1, (b) a nonadmitted insurer’s name is not used in connection with any nonadmitted insurance product of that insurer, (c) the unlicensed status of the insurer or of the insurance products is disclosed in type of a size no smaller than any telephone number, address, or fax number appearing in the advertisement or solicitation, and (d) the advertisement or solicitation does not contain any assertion, representation, or statement with respect to the business of insurance, or with respect to any person in the conduct of his or her insurance business, that is untrue, deceptive, or misleading, and that is known, or that by the exercise of reasonable care should be known, to be untrue, deceptive, or misleading. If the insurance is available from an eligible nonadmitted insurer that is a member of a group of insurers, advertisements and solicitations in accordance with this section may include the name of the group. A surplus line broker’s advertisements and solicitations shall not include any information about a nonadmitted insurer’s premiums or rates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 448, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1774.

(a) (1) On or before the first day of March of each year the surplus line broker, placing business for a home state insured, shall file with the commissioner a sworn statement of all business transacted under his or her surplus line license during the last preceding calendar year. The statement shall contain an account of the business done by the surplus line broker placing business for a home state insured for the prior year, and shall include (A) the total amount of gross premium, (B) the total gross premium for single state risks where 100 percent of the premium is attributable to risks in California, and (C) for multistate risks, the percentage of gross premium allocated to California and each other state. The commissioner may waive or modify any of the foregoing requirements by issuance of a notice
 published on the department’s Internet Web site.

(2) On or before the first day of March of each year, the home state insured that directly procures insurance pursuant to Section 1760 shall file with the commissioner a sworn statement of all business done during the last preceding calendar year. That statement shall contain an account of the insurance directly procured by the home state insured pursuant to Section 1760 for the prior year, and shall include (A) the total amount of premium, (B) the total premium for single state risks where 100 percent of the premium is attributable to risks in California, and (C) for multistate risks, the percentage of premium allocated to California and each other state. The commissioner may waive or modify any of the foregoing requirements by issuance of a notice published on the department’s Internet Web site.

(b) For purposes of this chapter,
 “business done” or “business transacted” means all insurance business conducted by the surplus line broker for a home state insured or directly procured by the home state insured. If two or more persons licensed as surplus line brokers are involved in placing a policy, only the one who is responsible for filing the confidential written report pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1763, shall be considered transacting business for tax purposes and then only one licensed surplus line broker shall include the policy in his or her sworn statement. The surplus line broker who is required to include the policy in his or her own statement is either (1) the one who is responsible for negotiating, effecting the placement, remitting the premium to the nonadmitted insurer or its representatives, and filing the confidential written report pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1763, or (2) the one surplus line broker who is delegated the responsibility for the filing of the confidential written report pursuant to
 subdivision (a) of Section 1763 pursuant to a written agreement that is (A) by and among the surplus line brokers referenced in paragraph (1) and this paragraph involved in the transaction, (B) signed by the surplus line brokers referenced in paragraph (1) and this paragraph involved in the transaction, and (C) provides by its terms that the agreement shall be made available to the commissioner or his or her designee, upon request.

(c) The date on which the surplus line broker transacting a policy prepares a bill or invoice for payment of all or part of the premiums due, shall be considered the date on which that business was done or transacted, subject to subdivision (d). This date shall be shown on the face of the bill or invoice and shall be
 referred to as the “invoice date.”

(d) (1) The invoice date shall be no more than 60 days after the policy effective date and no more than 60 days after the insurance was placed with a nonadmitted insurer, except as provided in paragraph (2).

(2) For purposes of this chapter, the amount of gross premium to be reported, if premiums are billed and payable in installments, shall be the amount of the installment premium, provided the amount and due date of each installment, or the basis for determining each installment, is identifiable in the policy or an endorsement, and either of the following conditions is satisfied:

(A) Installments under the policy are not billed more frequently than once per month.

(B) If more than one
 installment is billed in any month, the commissioner determines, in his or her discretion, that the installment billing method used does not unduly burden the commissioner’s ability to accurately determine the amount of premium paid by the insured.

(3) If a new or renewal policy has an effective date between January 1, 2011, to July 20, 2011, inclusive, and is placed on or before July 20, 2011, then the policy shall be considered to be business done by the surplus line broker as of the effective date. If a new or renewal policy has an effective date between January 1, 2011, to July 20, 2011, inclusive, then the policy shall be considered to be business done by the home state insured who directly procures policies as of the effective date. Cancellations or endorsements shall be business done on the same date as the policy that is being canceled or endorsed, if that policy effective date is on or before July 20, 2011. Installment premiums, as
 referenced in paragraph (2), shall be business done on the date of the most recent invoice issued on or before July 20, 2011, that included premium tax charges. This paragraph is enacted to address the July 21, 2011, effective date of the federal Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act (P.L. 111-203), and shall remain in effect only until October 18, 2012.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 109.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1775.

All such reports and statements shall be made on blanks furnished to the surplus line broker by the commissioner on application therefor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1775.1.

(a) Each calendar year, every surplus line broker whose annual tax for the preceding calendar year was twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or more shall make monthly installment payments on account of the annual tax on business done during the current calendar year imposed by Section 1775.5.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the commissioner may relieve a surplus line broker of his or her obligation to make monthly payments if the broker establishes to the satisfaction of the commissioner that either the broker has ceased to transact business in this state, or his or her annual tax for the current year will be less than twenty thousand dollars
 ($20,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 362, Sec. 4.   (AB 2734)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1775.2.

On or before February 1 of each year, the commissioner shall post on the department’s Internet Web site the installment payment forms prescribed by the commissioner to accompany surplus line tax remittances if monthly installment payments are required by Section 1775.1. Failure to secure those forms shall not relieve any broker from making or paying monthly installment payments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 312, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1775.3.

Each surplus line broker required to make monthly installment payments shall remit them on or before the first day of the third calendar month following the end of the accounting month in which the business was done. The annual payment under Section 1775.5 shall be in lieu of an installment payment under this section for the accounting month of December. Remittances for those payments shall be made payable to the commissioner and shall be made by electronic fund transfer in accordance with Section 1775.8 or delivered to the office of the commissioner, accompanied by an installment payment form prescribed by the commissioner if remittance by electronic fund transfer is not mandatory under Section 1775.8.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 455, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1775.4.

(a) The amount of the payment shall be 3 percent of the gross premiums charged less return premiums upon business done by the surplus line broker during the calendar month ending two calendar months immediately preceding the due date of the payment, as specified in Section 1775.3, excluding gross premiums and return premiums paid by him or her upon business governed by the provisions of Section 1760.5. If during any calendar month those return premiums upon business done by a surplus line broker exceed the gross premiums upon the business done by him or her in that calendar month, then no payment shall be payable by him or her in respect to that calendar month, and he or she may carry forward that excess to the next succeeding calendar month or
 months and apply it in reduction of the taxable premiums on business done by him or her in that succeeding calendar month or months. Even though no payment shall be payable by the broker, he or she shall file a return showing that his or her return premiums exceeded his or her gross premiums.

(b) In determining the applicability of subdivision (a) of Section 1775.1 to a surplus line broker who has acquired the business of another surplus line broker, the amount of tax liability of the acquired broker for the immediately preceding calendar year shall be added to the amount of the tax liability of the acquiring broker for the immediately preceding calendar year.

(c) All amounts paid, other than penalties and interest, shall be allowed as a credit on the annual tax imposed by Section 1775.5.

(d) If the total amount of
 monthly installment payments for any calendar year exceeds the amount of annual tax for that year, the excess shall be treated as an overpayment of annual tax and be allowed as a credit or refund.

(e) A penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the monthly payment due shall be levied upon and paid by any surplus line broker who fails to make the necessary payment within the time required, plus interest at the rate of 1 percent per calendar month or fraction thereof from the due date of the payment until the date payment is received by the commissioner, but not for any period after the due date of the annual tax. The penalty and interest shall be applied as prescribed in Section 12636.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. The commissioner may remit the penalty in a case where he or she finds, as a result of examination or otherwise, that the failure of, or delay in, payment arose out of excusable mistake or excusable inadvertence.

(f) For any part of a payment required that was not made within the time required by law, when the nonpayment or late payment was due to fraud on the part of the taxpayer, a penalty of 25 percent of the amount unpaid shall be added thereto, in addition to all other penalties otherwise imposed.

(g) The commissioner, upon a showing of good cause, may extend for not to exceed 10 days the time for making a monthly payment. The extension may be granted at any time, provided that a request therefor is filed with the commissioner within or prior to the period for which the extension may be granted. Any surplus line broker to whom an extension is granted shall, in addition to the monthly payment, pay interest at the rate of 1 percent per month, or fraction thereof, from the due date until the annual tax due date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 83, Sec. 28.   (AB 315)   Effective July 15, 2011.   Operative July 21, 2011, by Sec. 34 of Stats. 2011, Ch. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

1775.5.

(a) Every surplus line broker shall annually, on or before the first day of March of each year, pay to the Insurance Commissioner for the use of the State of California a tax of 3 percent of the gross premiums charged less return premiums upon business done by him or her under the authority of his or her license during the preceding calendar year, excluding any portions of premiums upon business done involving the risk finance portion of any blended finite risk product used in the financing element of state or federal Superfund environmental settlements involving remediation of soil or groundwater contamination or by the provisions of Section 1760.5. If during any calendar year 3 percent of the return premiums upon business done by a surplus line broker exceed 3 percent of the gross premiums upon that business done by him or her
 in that year, then he or she may either carry forward that excess to the next succeeding year and apply it as a credit against 3 percent of gross premiums on the business done by him or her in the succeeding year, or he or she may elect to receive, and thereupon be paid a refund equal to the amount of taxes theretofore paid by him or her on that excess of return premiums paid over gross premiums received.

(b) For the purpose of determining that tax, the total premium charged for all that nonadmitted insurance placed in a single transaction with one underwriter or group of underwriters, whether in one or more policies, shall be the entire premium charged on all nonadmitted insurance for the California home state insured. This provision shall not apply to interstate motor transit operations conducted between this and other states. With respect to those operations surplus line tax shall be payable on the entire premium charged on all nonadmitted
 insurance, less the following:

(1) The portion of the premium as is determined, as herein provided, to have been charged for operations in other states taxing the premium on operations in those states of an insured maintaining its headquarters office in this state.

(2) The premium for any operations outside of this state of an insured who maintains a headquarters operating office outside of this state and a branch office in this state.

(c) (1) A penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the payment due pursuant to this section shall be levied upon and paid by any surplus line broker who fails to make the necessary payment within the time required, plus interest at the rate of 1 percent per calendar month or fraction thereof, from March 1, the due date of the annual tax, until the date the payment
 is received by the commissioner. The penalty and interest shall be applied as prescribed in Section 12636.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. The commissioner, upon a showing of good cause, may extend for a period not to exceed 30 days, the time for filing a tax return or paying any amount required to be paid with the return. The extension may be granted at any time, provided that a request therefor is filed with the commissioner within, or prior to, the period for which the extension may be granted.

(2) Any surplus line broker to whom an extension is granted shall, in addition to the tax, pay interest at the rate of 1 percent per month or fraction thereof from March 1, until the date of payment. The commissioner may remit the penalty in a case where the commissioner finds, as a result of examination or otherwise, that the failure of or delay in payment arose out of excusable mistake or excusable inadvertence.

(d) For any part of a payment required by this section or by Section 1775.4 which was not made within the time required by law, when the nonpayment or late payment was due to fraud on the part of the broker, a penalty of 25 percent of the amount unpaid shall be added thereto, in addition to all other penalties otherwise imposed.

(e) For the purposes of this section,
 these terms shall have the following meanings:

(1) “Blended finite risk product” means a contractual arrangement combining risk finance with traditional risk transfer, where a distinct portion of the program cost represents the funding of a known, existing, nonfortuitous future cost, obligation, responsibility, or liability at its discounted net present value, and another portion of the program cost represents risk transfer for losses that have yet to occur related to the cost, obligation, responsibility, or liability that is the subject of the program.

(2) “Risk financing” means that portion of any blended finite risk product that represents the funding of a known, existing, nonfortuitous future cost, obligation, responsibility, or liability.

(3) “Risk finance” or “financing element” means a method of
 funding for a known future cost over a long time horizon in current-value dollars using the principle of net present value discounting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 110.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1775.6.

All tax moneys received by the commissioner pursuant to this chapter shall be transmitted to the State Treasurer to be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Insurance Tax Fund. Upon transmitting moneys to the State Treasurer, the commissioner shall furnish the Controller with a record of the amount transmitted and the surplus line brokers from whom the moneys have been received.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1775.7.

The money in the Insurance Tax Fund received from the commissioner pursuant to Section 1775.6 is hereby appropriated as follows:

(a) To pay the refunds authorized by this chapter.

(b) The balance of the money in the fund shall, on order of the Controller, be transferred to the State General Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1775.8.

(a) On and after January 1, 1994, and before January 1, 1995, every surplus line broker whose annual taxes for business done in calendar year 1992 or whose quarterly taxes for business done in calendar year 1993 exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall make payment by electronic funds transfer. On and after January 1, 1995, every surplus line broker whose annual taxes for business done in calendar year 1993 or in any calendar year thereafter exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) shall make payment by electronic funds transfer. The surplus line broker shall choose one of the acceptable methods described in Section 45 for completing the electronic funds transfer.

(b) Payment is deemed complete on the date the electronic funds transfer is initiated, if settlement to the state’s demand account occurs on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is initiated. If settlement to the state’s demand account does not occur on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is initiated, payment is deemed to occur on the date settlement occurs.

(c) (1) Any surplus line broker required to remit taxes by electronic funds transfer pursuant to this section who remits those taxes by means other than an appropriate electronic funds transfer, shall be assessed a penalty in an amount equal to 10 percent of the taxes due at the time of the payment.

(2) If the department finds that a surplus line broker’s failure to make payment by an appropriate electronic funds transfer in accordance with subdivision (a) is due to reasonable cause or circumstances beyond the surplus line broker’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and in the absence of willful neglect, that surplus line broker shall be relieved of the penalty provided in paragraph (1).

(3) Any surplus line broker seeking to be relieved of the penalty provided in paragraph (1) shall file with the department a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which the claim for relief is based.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1776.8 by Stats. 1995, Ch. 721, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1775.9.

(a) If the commissioner determines that the amount of tax reported by the surplus line broker is less than the tax disclosed by the commissioner’s examination, the commissioner shall permit the surplus line broker to provide additional information demonstrating that the surplus line broker owes a lesser amount. If within 60 days, or such additional time as the commissioner deems appropriate, the commissioner and the surplus line broker cannot agree on the amount owed, the commissioner shall propose in writing to the State Board of Equalization a deficiency assessment for the difference pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 12422 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) Section 12636.5, Article 3 (commencing with Section 12421) and Article 4 (commencing with Section 12491) of Chapter 4 of, and Article 1 (commencing with Section 12951) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 12977) of Chapter 7 of, Part 7 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall apply to surplus line brokers, except where inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, in which case this chapter shall govern.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 231, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1776.

Any surplus line broker who willfully fails or refuses to report to the commissioner any insurance on subject matter located within this state placed under his or her name with nonadmitted insurers, or who, by willful omission from the records required to be maintained by him or her for that purpose, attempts to evade the payment of taxes on any such insurance, is, in addition to being required to pay the tax, together with a penalty equal in amount to the tax, guilty of a misdemeanor.

It is a misdemeanor for any surplus line broker or special lines’ surplus line broker to accept or pay directly or indirectly any consideration or remuneration for or in connection with the placing of insurance that, if done by a person within this state, is governed by the provisions of this chapter, when the placing was not done by a person licensed therefor pursuant to this chapter.

It is a misdemeanor for any agent or broker to solicit, negotiate, or effect any insurance governed by the provisions of this chapter in nonadmitted insurers, except by and through a surplus line broker or special lines’ surplus line broker licensed pursuant to this chapter. Except in the case of insurance specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1760.5, it is a misdemeanor for any surplus line broker or special lines’ surplus line broker to accept, place, pay, or permit the payment of commission or other remuneration on insurance placed by him or her under authority of his or her license to any person other than one holding a license to act as an insurance agent, insurance broker, surplus line broker, or special lines’ surplus line broker, except that the business may be accepted by such surplus line broker or special lines’ surplus line broker directly from an insured or other person who would likewise be entitled to place the business directly with an admitted insurer without the solicitation, negotiation, or effecting thereof by an insurance agent or broker.

The commissioner may deny, suspend, or revoke any license issued pursuant to this code if he or she finds after notice and hearing in accordance with the procedure provided in Article 13 (commencing with Section 1737) of Chapter 5 that the licensee has violated any provisions of this section.

The permission granted in this chapter to place any insurance in a nonadmitted insurer shall not be deemed or construed to authorize any insurer to do business in this state.

Placement activities of a licensed surplus line broker in accordance with this chapter, including, but not limited to, policy issuance, shall not be deemed or construed to be business done by the insurer in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 240.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1778.

When a surplus line broker’s license is revoked for any reason other than the insufficiency of his sureties, a new license shall not be issued to him within one year after such revocation and until all indebtedness of the broker on former business has been paid to the commissioner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1779.

Every California home state insured for whom insurance has been effected with nonadmitted insurers shall, upon request in writing by the commissioner, produce for the commissioner’s examination all policies, contracts, and other documents evidencing that insurance, and shall disclose to the commissioner the amount of the gross premiums paid or agreed to be paid for
 that
 insurance. For refusal to obey that request, the insured shall forfeit to the State of California the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each refusal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 83, Sec. 30.   (AB 315)   Effective July 15, 2011.   Operative July 21, 2011, by Sec. 34 of Stats. 2011, Ch. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

1780.

A licensee or applicant for a license under this chapter shall notify the commissioner, in writing, of any change in the address from which he intends to conduct his business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 671.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.1. Surplus Line Advisory Organization [1780.50. - 1780.67.]

1780.50.
